District of Columbia statutes.
3-1905

Repealed

Establishment of District of Columbia Bicentennial Fund.

Repealed.

July 25, 1987, D.C. Law 7-12, § 6, 34 DCR 3783
Apr. 29, 1998, D.C. Law 12-86, § 401(c), 45 DCR 1172
1981 Ed., § 2-3505.